Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2301
Appeal; notice; effect.

When a person is convicted of an offense and gives notice of his or her intention to appeal to the Court of Appeals or Supreme Court, the execution of the sentence or judgment shall be suspended until such time as the appeal has been determined. The trial court, in its discretion, may allow the defendant to continue at liberty under bail or admit the defendant to bail during the suspension of sentence.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 503, p. 833;

R.S.1913, § 9172;

C.S.1922, § 10179;

C.S.1929, § 29-2301;

R.S.1943, § 29-2301;

Laws 1951, c. 87, § 3, p. 252;

Laws 1957, c. 107, § 1, p. 378;

Laws 1973, LB 146, § 4;

Laws 1982, LB 722, § 3;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 75.

Bail, conditions, see section 29-901.

When the execution of a sentence has been suspended under this section, and the defendant has been at liberty under bail, the bond may be continued without the consent of the surety during the period of the suspension. State v. Hurley, 201 Neb. 569, 270 N.W.2d 915 (1978).

The subject of review of judgments in criminal cases is covered by Chapter 29, article 23, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, 1943, and amendments thereto. State v. Berry, 192 Neb. 826, 224 N.W.2d 767 (1975).

Date of execution of death sentence is not an essential part of judgment. Iron Bear v. Jones, 149 Neb. 651, 32 N.W.2d 125 (1948); Iron Bear v. State, 149 Neb. 634, 32 N.W.2d 130 (1948).

Application for a writ of habeas corpus is proper procedure for the review of judgment where the petitioner is imprisoned without due process of law. Kuwitzsky v. O'Grady, 135 Neb. 466, 282 N.W. 396 (1938).

Error proceeding in a criminal case does not suspend the sentence within the legal meaning of the term, but does stay the execution of the sentence. State ex rel. Hunter v. Jurgensen, 135 Neb. 136, 280 N.W. 886 (1938).

Where defendant negligently failed to file transcript and petition in error in Supreme Court within time required after rendition of judgment, a motion to dismiss the petition in error must be sustained. Goodman v. State, 131 Neb. 662, 269 N.W. 383 (1936).

Petition in error must be filed in Supreme Court within one month after rendition of judgment. District court cannot set aside its own judgment during term and re-enter same judgment merely to confer jurisdiction on Supreme Court. Dimmel v. State, 128 Neb. 191, 258 N.W. 271 (1935).

Jurisdiction of matter of suspension of sentence rests with district court. Barker v. State, 75 Neb. 289, 103 N.W. 1134, 106 N.W. 450 (1905).